California, session 20252026, AB823.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 42361 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:42361. As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Cleaning product” has the same meaning as “designated product” in Section 108952 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) “Person” means an individual, business, or other entity.(c) “Personal care product” means an article intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced to, or otherwise applied to, the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and an article intended for use as a component of that type of article.(d) “Personal care product” does not include a prescription drug, as defined in Section 110010.2 of the Health and Safety Code.(e) “Plastic microbead” means an intentionally added solid plastic particle measuring five millimeters or less in every dimension.SEC. 2. Section 42362 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:42362. (a) A person shall not sell or offer for promotional purposes in this state a personal care product containing plastic microbeads that are used to exfoliate or cleanse in a rinse-off product, including, but not limited to, toothpaste.(b) On and after January 1, 2029, a person shall not sell, offer for sale, distribute, or offer for promotional purposes in this state any of the following: (1) A personal care product containing plastic microbeads that are used as an abrasive to clean, exfoliate, or polish, in a non-rinse-off product.(2) A cleaning product containing plastic microbeads that are used as an abrasive to clean, exfoliate, or polish.(3) A personal care product containing plastic glitter.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person, until January 1, 2030, may continue to sell, offer for sale, distribute, or offer for promotional purposes in this state an existing stock of personal care products containing plastic glitter that were acquired and transported into the state before January 1, 2029.